California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(1) The needs and desires of the recreational boating community in being able to properly and economically dispose of recreational vessels in lieu of abandoning them.

(2) Any environmental, economic, safety, or practical problems that need to be addressed before initiating a program to allow recreational vessels to be turned in to a public agency in lieu of abandonment, and the associated benefits of that program or any program that can prevent recreational vessels from being abandoned.

(3) An estimate of the number of vessels that may be turned in to local agencies in lieu of abandonment.

(d) (1) The director shall appoint an Abandoned Vessel Advisory Committee to assist the department in preparing recommendations.

(2) The membership of the committee shall include, but need not be limited to, representatives of all of the following:

(A) Boating law enforcement agencies.

(B) Entities that engage in the salvage or disposal of recreational vessels.

(C) Boat dealers.

(D) Boating, sailing, and yachting organizations.

(E) Owners and operators of public and private marina facilities.

(3) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation and may not be reimbursed by the state for expenses.

(4) The department shall assist the committee in carrying out its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

526.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any wrecked property that is an unseaworthy derelict or hulk, abandoned property as described in Section 522, or property removed from a navigable waterway pursuant to Section 523 or 524 that is an unseaworthy derelict or hulk, may be sold or otherwise disposed of by the public agency that removed or caused the removal of the property pursuant to this section, subject to the following conditions, except a surrendered vessel, as defined in Section 526.1, may be disposed of immediately upon acceptance by a public agency and is not subject to the following conditions:

(1) The property has been appraised by disinterested persons, and has an estimated value of less than two thousand
 dollars ($2,000).

(2) There is no discernable registration, license, hull identification number, or other identifying insignia on the property, or the Department of Motor Vehicles is unable to produce any record of the registered or legal owners or lienholders.

(3) Not less than 72 hours before the property was removed, the peace officer or authorized public employee securely attached to the property a distinctive notice stating that the property would be removed by the public agency.

(4) Within 48 hours after the removal, excluding weekends and holidays, the public agency that removed or caused the removal of the property sent notice of the removal to the registered and legal owners, if known or discovered subsequent to the removal, at their addresses of record with the Department of Motor Vehicles, and to any other
 person known to have an interest in the property. A notice sent by the public agency shall be sent by certified or first-class mail.

(5) If the public agency is unable to locate the registered and legal owners of the property or persons known to have an interest in the property as provided in paragraph (4), the public agency published, or caused to be published, the notice of removal for at least two weeks in succession in one or more daily newspapers circulated in the county.

(b) The notice of removal required by paragraphs (3) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall state all of the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the public agency providing the notice.

(2) A description of the property removed.

(3) The location from which the property is to be or was removed.

(4) The location of the intended or actual place of storage.

(5) The authority and purpose for removal of the property.

(6) A statement that the property may be claimed and recovered within 15 days of the date the notice of removal was issued pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a), whichever is later, after payment of any costs incurred by the public agency related to salvage and storage of the property, and that following the expiration of the 15-day period, the property will be sold or otherwise disposed of by the public agency.

(7) A statement that the registered or legal owners or any other person known to have
 an interest in the property has the opportunity for a poststorage hearing before the public agency that removed, or caused the removal of, the property to determine the validity of the removal and storage if a request for a hearing is made in person or in writing to that public agency within 10 days from the date of notice; that if the registered or legal owners or any other person known to have an interest in the property disagree with the decision of the public agency, the decision may be reviewed pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code; and that during the time of the initial hearing, or during the time the decision is being reviewed pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code, the vessel in question shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of.

(c) (1) Any requested hearing shall be conducted within 48 hours of the time the request for a hearing is received by the public agency, excluding weekends and
 holidays. The public agency that removed the vehicle may authorize its own officers or employees to conduct the hearing, but the hearing officer shall not be the same person who directed the removal and storage of the property.

(2) The failure of either the registered or legal owners or any other person known to have an interest in the property to request or attend a scheduled hearing shall not affect the validity of the hearing.

(d) The property may be claimed and recovered by its registered and legal owners, or by any other person known to have an interest in the property, within 15 days of the date the notice of removal was issued pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a), whichever is later, after payment of any costs incurred by the public agency related to salvage and storage of the property.

(e) The
 property may be sold or otherwise disposed of by the public agency not less than 15 days from the date the notice of removal was issued pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a), whichever is later, or the date of actual removal, whichever is later.

(f) The proceeds from the sale of the property, after deducting expenses for salvage, storage, sales costs, and any property tax liens, shall be deposited in the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund for grants to local agencies, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 525.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not be construed to authorize the lien sale or destruction of any seaworthy vessel, other than a surrendered vessel as defined in Section 526.1, that is currently registered and operated in accordance with local, state, and federal law.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 416, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 204, Sec. 3.   (SB 122)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

526.1.

For purposes of this article, “surrendered vessel” means a recreational vessel that the verified titleholder has willingly surrendered to a willing public agency under both of the following conditions:

(a) The public agency has determined, in its sole discretion, that the vessel is in danger of being abandoned, and therefore has a likelihood of causing environmental degradation or becoming a hazard to navigation.

(b) The decision to accept a vessel is based solely on the potential of the vessel to likely be abandoned and cause environmental degradation or become a hazard to navigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 204, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

It is the intent of the Legislature that a sum of not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) be appropriated from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund to the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund for grants to local agencies pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 525 in each fiscal year and that grants from the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund be matched by not less than a 10-percent contribution from the local agency receiving the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 930, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Salvage [530. - 534.]

530.

Sheriffs and all persons employed by them or aiding in the recovery and preservation of wrecked property, are entitled to a reasonable allowance as salvage for their services, and to all expenses incurred by them in their performance, out of the property saved. The officer having the custody of the property shall detain it until the allowance is paid or tendered. But the whole salvage claimed shall not exceed one-half of the value of the property or proceeds on which it is charged, and every agreement, order, or adjustment allowing a greater salvage is void, unless ordered and allowed by the superior court of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

Every officer to whom an order for the delivery of wrecked property or the payment of its proceeds is directed, shall present to the claimant of the property or proceeds, a written statement of the claims for salvage and expenses. If the claimant refuses to allow that amount, it shall be adjusted as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

If, in any case, the amount of salvage and expenses is not settled by agreement, on the application of the owner or consignee of the property, or the master or supercargo having charge at the time of the wreck, or of a claimant having an order for the property, or of a person claiming salvage or expenses, the superior court of the county shall determine the amount of salvage and expenses in a summary way, either by itself hearing the allegations and proofs, or by referring the questions to three disinterested freeholders of the county, who shall have the same powers and shall proceed in the same manner as referees in civil actions. Their decisions as to the whole amount and as to the sums to be paid to each person interested shall be entered as the judgment of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

The fees and expenses of the contest shall be paid by the person upon whose application it was had, and are a charge on the property saved. Each referee is entitled to such per diem and expenses as the court may order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

534.

Any person, other than the master, mate, or a seaman of a wrecked vessel, who rescues it, or its appurtenances or cargo from danger, is entitled to a reasonable compensation, to be paid out of the property saved. He shall have a lien for salvage upon the vessel and its appurtenances or cargo, as the case may be. A claim for salvage, as such, can not accrue against any vessel, or its freight, or cargo, in favor of the owners, officers, or crew of another vessel belonging to the same owners; but the actual cost at the time of the services rendered by one such vessel to another, when in distress, are payable through a general average contribution on the property saved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Marine Debris [550. - 552.]

550.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) A “vessel” includes every description of watercraft or other artificial
 contrivance used, or capable of being used, as a means of transportation by water.

(b) “Marine debris” is a vessel or part of a vessel, including a derelict, wreck, hulk, or part of any ship or other watercraft or dilapidated vessel, that is unseaworthy and not reasonably fit or capable of being made fit to be used as a means of transportation by water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (AB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, marine debris that is floating, sunk, partially sunk, or beached in or on a public waterway, public beach, or on state tidelands or submerged lands may be removed and destroyed, or otherwise disposed of, by any state, county, city, or other public
 agency having jurisdiction over its location or having authority to remove marine debris or solid waste, subject to the following conditions:

(A) The object meets the definition of marine debris in subdivision (b) of Section 550 and has no value or a value that does not exceed the cost of removal and disposal.

(B) If there is no discernible registration, hull identification number, or other identification insignia, a peace officer or authorized public employee securely attaches to the marine debris a notice stating that the marine debris shall be removed by the public agency if not claimed
 or removed within 10 days.

(C) If there is discernible registration, hull identification number, or other identification insignia, a notice is attached to the marine debris as described in subparagraph (B), and sent to the owner of the marine debris, if known, at the owner’s address of record with the Department of Motor Vehicles, by certified or
 first-class mail.

(D) The marine debris remains in place for 10 days from the date of attaching the notice to the marine debris or from the date the notice letter was sent, whichever is later, before being removed.

(2) (A) The notice attached to the marine debris shall state the name, address, and telephone number of the public agency providing the notice.

(B) A notice sent to the owner shall contain the information specified in subparagraph (A), and further state that the marine debris
 will be removed and disposed of within 10 days if not claimed, and that the marine debris may be claimed and recovered upon the payment of the public agency’s costs.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), marine debris that constitutes a public
 nuisance or a danger to navigation, health, safety, or the environment may be removed and disposed of immediately, unless the marine debris is whole or not demolished during removal, in which case it shall be maintained or stored for 10 days to permit notification of the owner. If the owner of the marine debris is not identifiable, the marine debris may be immediately destroyed or otherwise disposed of.

(c) Costs incurred by a public
 agency for removal and disposal of marine debris may be recovered from an owner or any person or entity who placed the marine debris in or on or caused the marine debris to be in or on the public waterway, public beach, or state tidelands or submerged lands through any appropriate legal action in the courts of this state or by administrative action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (AB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

On or before January 1, 2017, the State Lands Commission shall adopt, at a public meeting and after consultation with interested state and local agencies, best management practices for salvage of marine debris. These best management
 practices shall be published by the
 State Lands Commission
 on its Internet Web site. The State Lands Commission may amend the best management
 practices from time to time by the same
 process, as the State Lands Commission deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (AB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Offenses [570. - 571.]

570.

Any person who keeps any wrecked property, or its proceeds, after the salvage and expenses have been agreed to or adjusted, and the amount paid to him, is punishable by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

571.

(a) A person who takes away any goods from a stranded vessel, or any goods cast by the sea upon the land, or found in a bay or creek, or who knowingly has in his or her possession any goods so taken or found, and does not deliver them to the sheriff of the county where they were found, or notify him or her of his or her readiness to do so within 30 days after they have been taken by him or her or have come into his or her possession, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 610, Sec. 30.   (SB 717)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Service of Process [600. - 609.]

600.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Watercraft” means any boat, ship, barge, craft or floating thing designed for navigation in the water; and

(b) “Nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this State at the time the accident or collision occurs or at the time a cause of action or claim for relief arises against him, and also means a person who, at the time the accident or collision occurs or at the time a cause of action or claim for relief arises against him is a resident of this State but subsequently becomes a nonresident of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

Where the nonresident has died prior to the commencement of a suit, action or proceeding brought pursuant to this chapter service of process shall be made on the executor or administrator of the nonresident in the same manner and on the same notice as is provided in the case of the nonresident. Where a suit, action or proceeding has been duly commenced under the provisions of this chapter by service upon a defendant or respondent who dies thereafter, the court shall allow the suit, action or proceeding to be continued against his executor or administrator upon motion with such notice as the court deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

Proof of compliance with Section 604 shall be made in the event of service by mail by affidavit of the plaintiff or libelant or by affidavit of his attorney showing said mailing, together with the return receipt of the United States post office bearing the signature of the defendant or respondent. The affidavit and receipt shall be appended to the original summons or original citation, which shall be filed with the court from out of which the summons or citation issued within such time as the court may allow for the return of the summons or citation.

In the event of personal service outside this State, compliance with Section 604 may be proved by the return of any duly constituted public officer, qualified to serve like process of and in the state or jurisdiction where the defendant or respondent is found, showing such service to have been made. The return shall be appended to the original summons or original citation which shall be filed as aforesaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

The court in which the suit, action or proceeding is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend the suit, action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

In the event of service of process pursuant to this chapter upon a nonresident outside this State, the person so served shall have 60 days from receipt of the notice required under Section 604 in which to appear in the suit, action or proceeding in which the summons or citation was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

609.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as affecting other methods of service of process upon nonresidents as now provided by existing laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Marinas [630. - 630.]

630.

The operator of every privately or publicly owned marina or small craft harbor, or facilities in connection therewith, furnishing electrical power to slips or berths for use aboard any vessel, may provide facilities for submetering to measure the electrical power actually used by or aboard each vessel and may base charges therefor upon that use including the actual cost of inspection, testing, and registration of submeters that may be charged by any authority having jurisdiction thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 205, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Operation and Equipment of Vessels [650. - 774.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Operation and Equipment [650. - 674.]

650.

It is the policy of this state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use and equipment of vessels and to promote uniformity of laws relating thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

650.1.

(a) This chapter shall apply to vessels and associated equipment used, to be used, or carried in vessels used on waters subject to the jurisdiction of this state.

(b) This chapter, except those sections that expressly indicate otherwise, shall not apply to the following:

(1) Foreign vessels temporarily using waters subject to state jurisdiction.

(2) Military or public vessels of the United States, except
 recreational-type public vessels.

(3) A vessel whose owner is a state or subdivision thereof, that is used principally for governmental purposes, and that is clearly identifiable as such.

(4) Ship’s lifeboats.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “subdivision thereof” or “subdivision of the state” includes cities and counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   (AB 1682)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(a) “Alcohol” means any form or derivative of ethyl alcohol (ethanol).

(b) “Alcohol concentration” means either grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath.

(c) “Associated equipment” means any of the following, excluding radio equipment:

(1) Any system, part, or component of a boat as originally manufactured or any similar part
 or component manufactured or sold for replacement, repair, or improvement of the system, part, or component.

(2) Any accessory or equipment for, or appurtenance to, a boat.

(3) Any marine safety article, accessory, or equipment intended for use by a person on board a boat.

(d) “Boat” means any vessel that is any of the following:

(1) Manufactured or used primarily for noncommercial use.

(2) Leased, rented, or chartered to another for the latter’s noncommercial use.

(3) Engaged in the carrying of six or fewer passengers, including those for-hire vessels carrying more than three passengers while using inland waters of the state
 that are not declared navigable by the United States Coast Guard.

(4) Commercial vessels required to be numbered pursuant to Section 9850 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) “Chemical test” means a test that analyzes an individual’s breath, blood, or urine for evidence of drug or alcohol use.

(f) “Controlled substance” means controlled substance as defined in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Department” means the Department of Boating and Waterways.

(h) “Director” means the Director of Boating and Waterways.

(i) “Drug” means any substance or combination of substances other than alcohol that could so affect the nervous
 system, brain, or muscles of a person as to impair to an appreciable degree the person’s ability to operate a vessel in the manner that an ordinarily prudent person, in full possession of their faculties, using reasonable care, would operate a similar vessel under like conditions.

(j) “Engine cut-off switch” means a switch that automatically stops the engine of a power-driven vessel if activated by an engine cut-off switch link.

(k) “Engine cut-off switch link” means a device that, if attached to an operator, activates an engine cut-off switch if the operator is separated from the power-driven vessel. This term includes a lanyard or another mechanical device and a wireless cut-off link that transmits an electromagnetic signal to an engine cut-off switch.

(l) “Intoxicant” means any form of alcohol, drug, or combination thereof.

(m) “Legal owner” is a person holding the legal title to a vessel under a conditional sale contract, the mortgagee of a vessel, or the renter or lessor of a vessel to the state, or to any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state, under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement that grants possession of the vessel to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(n) “Manufacturer” means any person engaged in any of the following:

(1) The manufacture, construction, or assembly of boats or associated equipment.

(2) The manufacture or construction of components for boats and associated equipment to be sold for subsequent assembly.

(3) The importation into this state for sale of boats, associated equipment, or components thereof.

(o) “Marine employer” means the owner, managing operator, charterer, agent, master, or person in charge of a
 vessel, other than a recreational vessel.

(p) “Motorboat” means any vessel propelled by machinery, whether or not the machinery is the principal source of propulsion, but shall not include a vessel that has a valid marine document issued by the United States Coast Guard or any federal agency successor thereto.

(q) “Operator” means the person aboard a vessel who meets any of the following:

(1) Is steering the vessel while underway.

(2) Is responsible for the operation of the vessel while underway.

(3) Is at least 18 years of age and is attentive and supervising the operation of the vessel by a person 12, 13, 14, or 15 years of age pursuant to Section 658.5.

(r) (1) “Owner” is a person
 that meets one or more of the following criteria:

(A) Has all the incidents of ownership, including the legal title, of a vessel whether or not that person lends, rents, or pledges the vessel.

(B) The person entitled to the possession of a vessel as the purchaser under a
 conditional sale
 contract.

(C) The mortgagor of a vessel.

(2) “Owner” does not include a person holding legal title to a vessel under a conditional sale contract, the mortgagee of a vessel, or the renter or lessor of a vessel to the state or to any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement that grants possession of the vessel to
 the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(s) “Passenger” means every person carried on board a vessel other than any of the following:

(1) The owner or the owner’s representative.

(2) The operator.

(3) Bona fide members of the crew engaged in the business of the vessel who have contributed no consideration for their carriage and who are paid for their services.

(4) Any guest on board a vessel that is
 being used exclusively for pleasure purposes who has not contributed any consideration, directly or indirectly, for their carriage.

(t) “Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other entity, but does not include the United States, the state, or a municipality or subdivision thereof.

(u) “Personal flotation device” means a device that is approved by the Commandant of the United States Coast Guard pursuant to Part 160 (commencing with Section 160.001-1) of Title 46
 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(v) “Personal watercraft” means a vessel
 propelled by a water-jet pump or other machinery as its primary source of motive power and designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on the vessel, rather than sitting or standing
 within the vessel’s hull.

(w) “Recreational vessel” means a vessel that is being used only for pleasure.

(x) “Registered owner” is the person registered by the Department of Motor Vehicles as the owner of the vessel.

(y) “Special-use area” means all or a portion of a waterway that is set aside for specified uses or activities to the exclusion of other incompatible uses or activities.

(z) “State” means a state of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, and the District of Columbia.

(aa) “State of principal use” means the state on which waters a vessel is used or intended to be used most during a calendar year.

(ab) “Static thrust” means the forward or backward thrust developed by a propulsion machinery while stationary.

(ac) “Throwable personal flotation device” means a personal flotation device that is intended to be thrown to a person in the water. A personal flotation device marked as Type IV or Type V with Type IV performance is considered a throwable personal flotation device. Unless specifically marked otherwise, a wearable personal flotation device is not a throwable personal flotation device.

(ad) “Undocumented vessel” means any vessel that is not required to have, and does not have, a valid marine document issued by the United States Coast Guard or any federal agency successor thereto.

(ae) “Use” means operate, navigate, or employ.

(af) “Vessel” includes every description of a watercraft or other artificial contrivance used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, except either of the following:

(1) A seaplane on the water.

(2) A watercraft specifically designed to operate on a permanently fixed course, the movement of which is restricted to a fixed track or arm to which the watercraft is attached or by which the watercraft is controlled.

(ag) “Water skis, an aquaplane, or a similar device” includes all forms of water skiing, barefoot
 skiing, skiing on skim boards, knee boards, or other contrivances, parasailing, ski kiting, or any activity where a person is towed behind or alongside a boat.

(ah) “Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state.

(ai) “Wearable personal flotation device” means a personal flotation device that is intended to be worn or otherwise attached to the body. A personal flotation device marked as Type I, Type II, Type III, or Type V with Type I, II, or III performance is considered a wearable
 personal flotation device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 14.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

651.1.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning, “bather” or “bathing” means a person floating, swimming, wading, or bodysurfing, with or without the use of a flotation device, including, but not limited to, floating upon or with the aid of a surfboard, paddle board, surfmat, innertube, life preserver, or air mattress, except a flotation device which is designed to be propelled by sail, mechanical means, power, oars, or paddle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

651.5.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide every person who originally registers, or who acquires the ownership certificate of, a vessel required to be numbered pursuant to Division 3.5 (commencing with Section 9840) of the Vehicle Code with a copy of guidelines for safe vessel operation prepared by the Department of Boating and Waterways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 216, Sec. 3.   Effective June 29, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

(a) The department may issue regulations to do all of the following:

(1) Establish minimum safety standards for boats and associated equipment.

(2) Require the installation, carrying, or using of associated equipment.

(3) Prohibit the installation, carrying, or using of associated equipment that does not conform with safety standards established pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The regulations shall conform with the federal navigation laws or with the navigation rules promulgated by the United States Coast Guard, or any successor
 thereto.

(c) A person or public agency shall not use or give permission for the use of a vessel that does not carry the equipment or meet the standards established pursuant to this chapter.

(d) A peace officer or harbor police officer authorized to enforce this chapter may order the termination of the operation of a vessel that is found to be unsafe for operation pursuant to Section 6550.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. A violation of an order under this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(e) A person found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of subdivision (d), or of any regulation adopted by the department pursuant to this section, shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or both that fine and
 imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 107.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

652.5.

(a) The use of a distinctive blue light as prescribed by the department is reserved for public safety vessels and may be displayed during the day or night whenever the vessel may be engaged in direct law enforcement activities, including, but not limited to, those activities specified in subdivision (a) of Section 663.7, or public safety activities conducted by a fire department or a fire protection district, where identification of a public safety vessel is desirable or where necessary for safety reasons.

(b) That light when used shall be in addition to prescribed lights and day signals required by law.

(c) The display of these blue lights on vessels for other
 purposes is prohibited.

(d) A vessel approaching, overtaking, being approached, or being overtaken by a moving public safety vessel operating with a siren or an illuminated blue light, or a vessel approaching a stationary public safety vessel displaying an illuminated blue light, shall immediately slow to a speed sufficient to maintain steerage only, shall alter its course, within its ability, so as not to inhibit or interfere with the operation of the public safety vessel, and shall proceed, unless otherwise directed by the operator of the public safety vessel, at the reduced speed until beyond the area of operation of the public safety vessel.

(e) The operator of a cable ferry shall take whatever reasonable action is necessary to provide a clear course for a public safety vessel operating with a siren or an illuminated blue light, or both.

(f) For purposes of this section, “public safety vessel” means a law enforcement, a fire department, or a fire protection district vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   (AB 78)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

654.

(a) (1) For the purposes of this section, a “muffler” or “muffler system” is a sound suppression device or system that is designed and installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal combustion engine and prevents excessive or unusual noise.

(2) For the purposes of this section, an underwater through-the-propeller-hub exhaust outlet system is a muffler system.

(b) A motorized recreational vessel that is operated in or upon the inland waters, or in or upon ocean waters that are within one mile of the coastline of the state shall be equipped at all times with a muffler or a muffler system that is all of the following:

(1) In good working condition.

(2) In constant operation.

(3) Installed in a manner that effectively brings the vessel into compliance with Section 654.05.

(c) This section does not apply to motorized recreational vessels competing under a local public entity or United States Coast Guard permit in a regatta, in a boat race, while on trial runs, or while on official trials for speed records during the time and in the designated area authorized by the permit. In addition, this section does not apply to motorized recreational vessels preparing for a race or regatta if authorized by a permit issued by the local entity having jurisdiction over the area where the preparations occur.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 496, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

654.03.

(a) A person may not manufacture for sale a motorized recreational vessel that is not equipped with a muffler or muffler system, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 654, that brings the vessel into compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 654.05, except as authorized under subdivision (b).

(b) A person may manufacture for sale a motorized recreational vessel that is not equipped as required under subdivision (a) if the vessel is designed, manufactured, and sold for the sole purpose of competing in racing events.

(c) A person may not sell a vessel that is exempted under subdivision (b) unless there is compliance with both of the following:

(1) The sales agreement includes a statement that the vessel is designed, manufactured, and sold for the sole purpose of competing in racing events and may not be operated in or upon the inland waters, or in or upon ocean waters that are within one mile of the coastline of the state, except under the conditions described in subdivision (c) of Section 654.

(2) The statement described in paragraph (1) is signed by both the buyer and the seller.

(d) Both the buyer and the seller of a vessel exempted under subdivision (b) shall maintain copies of the sales agreement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) A person may not operate a vessel that is exempted under subdivision (b) unless a copy of the sales agreement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) is on board the vessel.

(f) A person may not operate a vessel that is exempted under subdivision (b) in or upon the inland waters, or in or upon ocean waters within one mile of the coastline of the state, except under the conditions described in subdivision (c) of Section 654.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 496, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Section operative January 1, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

654.05.

(a) The owner of a motorized recreational vessel that is numbered pursuant to Section 9850 of the Vehicle Code, or that is documented by an agency of the federal government, shall not operate, or authorize the operation of, the vessel in or upon the inland waters, or in or upon ocean waters that are within one mile of the coastline of the state, in a manner that exceeds the following noise levels:
